Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB969.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Responsible Outdoor Lighting Control Act.Section 2. Intent.Government structures, facilities, places and spaces should serve as models of best practices for private structures, facilities, places and spaces. This Commonwealth should encourage residents, business owners and others to join in transitioning to responsible lighting principles.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617 "BUG rating." A luminaire classification system, developed by the United States Illuminating Engineering Society (IES), that ranks and defines how many lumens of light a lighting unit emits backwards, upwards and in glare."Construction." The process of building, altering, improving or demolishing any public structure or building, or other public improvements of any kind, to any public real property. The term does not include the routine operation or maintenance of existing structures, buildings or real property."Correlated color temperature" or "CCT." A color of the light perceived by the eye that replicates the Kelvin temperature spectrum of a metal object when heated, with "warmer" colors toward the red end of the spectrum and "cooler" colors toward the blue end of the spectrum."Environmentally sensitive area." A State game land, State forest, State park or State natural heritage area. The term includes an area that is an exemplary ecological community that would be easily disturbed or degraded by human activity and development, as determined by the relevant State agency, State-aided entity or State-related institution, in consultation with the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources."Fully shielded." A lighting unit that is constructed in such a manner that all light emitted, either directly from the lamp or indirectly by reflection or refraction from any part of the lighting unit, is projected below the horizontal plane, in accordance with the following:(1) The downward-pointing beam of light should preferably be cast within an angle of 60 degrees or less from the vertical.(2) No part of the lamp should protrude outside of the 20250HB0969PN1050 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lighting unit or shield."Glare." Light emitted by a lighting unit that causes reduced visibility of objects or momentary blindness."Lamp." The component of a lighting unit that produces light."Light pollution." The scattering of artificial light into the nighttime sky, caused by excessive or improperly positioned artificial outdoor lighting, resulting in sky glow, light trespass and glare."Light trespass." Light emitted by a lighting unit that shines beyond the boundaries of the property on which the lighting unit is located."Lighting unit." A complete artificial illuminating device, installed or portable, including a lamp, together with the parts designed to distribute the light, such as a reflector or refractor, parts to position and protect the lamps and parts to connect the lamps to the power supply."Lumen." A specific standard unit of measurement of luminous flux."Outdoor lighting unit." Outdoor artificial illuminating devices, installed or portable, used for flood lighting, roadway lighting and area lighting, general illumination or advertisement."Partially shielded lighting unit." A lighting unit that projects or directs its light parallel to or above the horizontal plane. The light from a lighting unit may be emitted either directly from the lamp or indirectly by reflection or refraction from any part of the lighting unit producing significant light pollution."Permanent outdoor lighting unit." An outdoor lighting unit 20250HB0969PN1050 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or system of lighting units that is outdoors and that is used for seven days or longer."Reflective roadway marking." Lines and markers with reflective properties to aid with vehicular and pedestrian safety."Reflective signage." Roadway and informational signage that has reflective properties to aid with vehicular and pedestrian safety."Responsible lighting principles." The use of advanced lighting technologies, including shielding, an upper limit on CCT, on-off controls, dimming controls, motion sensors, phosphor applications and RGB or red, green and blue diodes. All applicable lighting shall utilize the best lighting technologies practically available at the time at which a lamp or other light fixture is installed or replaced."Roadway lighting." Permanent outdoor lighting units that are specifically intended to illuminate roadways for vehicular traffic."Sky glow." Brightening of the night sky over inefficiently and improperly lit areas."State agency." Any of the following, as the terms are defined under 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions):(1) An executive agency.(2) An independent agency.(3) A State-affiliated entity."State-aided entity." A political subdivision or other governmental unit that receives State funds directly or indirectly for construction."State-related institution." The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Lincoln University or 20250HB0969PN1050 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Temple University."Wallpack light." Lighting units that are fixed to a building's exterior, usually on a wall that faces outward from a building.Section 4. Outdoor lighting control.(a) Restrictions on outdoor lighting units.--A State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity may not install or replace permanent outdoor lighting units or lamps unless the following conditions are met:(1) The permanent outdoor lighting unit is fully shielded and emits:(i) Backward light not above an angle of 60 degrees or less from the downward vertical direction.(ii) Zero lumens upward and corresponding to the IES rating of U0 on the BUG rating system.(iii) Forward or sideways light not above an angle of 60 degrees from the downward vertical direction to eliminate glare.(2) Outdoor lighting units are established in ways to avoid light trespass. In environmentally sensitive areas, light trespass must be completely eliminated. In all other areas, light trespass at the property boundary may not exceed 0.5 lux. This paragraph shall not apply to existing light fixtures in place as of the effective date of this paragraph.(3) Any wallpack lights must be fully shielded to an angle of no more than 60 degrees from the downward vertical direction to eliminate glare and light trespass.(4) The lighting units shall have a correlated color temperature less than or equal to 3,000K. In residential areas, CCT may not exceed 2,700K. In dark sky locations or 20250HB0969PN1050 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 environmentally sensitive areas, CCT may not exceed 2,200K. A lighting unit may not have a CCT that exceeds 3,000K, except as provided in subsection (d).(5) The use of outdoor lighting must be minimized to only that which is needed for comfort and safety, as determined by the State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity having jurisdiction over the property, while complying with responsible lighting principles. The agency having jurisdiction of the property shall consider the following for buildings, to the extent consistent with comfort and safety needs:(i) Placing lights only at entrances and exits.(ii) Utilizing low intensity facade lighting that ensures that the light projects downward and that no lighting spills beyond the facade being lit.(iii) Turning off or dimming lighting units between 11 p.m. and 6 a.m.(6) Lighting units in locations that are not in use after 11 p.m., including in environmentally sensitive areas, must use timers set to turn off after 11 p.m. or be equipped with motion sensors or manual switches.(7) Light trespass from the interior of a building or structure must be minimized by lowering window shades after sunset or by turning off lighting when not in use.(8) At the time of installation or replacement of lighting units for roadways, the State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity with jurisdiction over the roadway shall determine whether reflective roadway markings or reflective signage are appropriate and safe for the situation in lieu of outdoor lighting. Reflective roadway 20250HB0969PN1050 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 markings and reflective signage shall be used unless it is determined by the agency having jurisdiction over the roadway that adequate lighting cannot be achieved by reflective means.(9) For lighting fixtures located within the State Capitol Complex determined by the Capitol Preservation Committee to be historic in nature, light bulbs shall be transitioned to bulbs with a CCT exceeding 1,800K. This paragraph shall not apply to the Capitol Dome.(b) Replacement of current lighting units.--(1) A lighting unit with lamps greater than 3,000K that was installed prior to the effective date of this paragraph and that produce light pollution is not required to be replaced until the end of the life of the lamp but shall comply with subsection (c).(2) At the end of the life of an existing lamp, partially shielded lighting units shall be fitted with a new lamp with a CCT that does not exceed 3,000K and shall be remediated, either by repositioning or by full shielding, so that the light casts to an angle of not more than 60 degrees from the downward vertical direction.(3) If a State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity currently operates unshielded or partially shielded lighting units, the following shall apply:(i) All unshielded or partially shielded lighting units shall be:(A) immediately remediated upon the end of the life of the lamp with a new lamp with a CCT that does not exceed 3,000K; and(B) remediated either by repositioning the 20250HB0969PN1050 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lighting unit or by fully shielding the lamp so that the light casts to an angle of no more than 60 degrees from the downward vertical direction.(ii) If a State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity chooses to replace current, unshielded or partially shielded lighting units before the end of the life of the lamp, the State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity may not purchase new, unshielded or partially shielded lighting units as replacements. If the State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity purchases new, unshielded or partially shielded lighting units as replacements, the State agency, State-related institution or State-aided entity may not receive State assistance with the cost of the new lighting units.(c) Repositioning of current lighting units.--Wherever possible, existing partially shielded and unshielded lighting units shall be repositioned so as to minimize glare, light trespass and upward-directed light.(d) Exceptions.--The following instances shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (a):(1) If Federal laws, rules or regulations preempt State regulations.(2) If fire, police, rescue or repair personnel need light for temporary emergencies or road repair work.(3) If it has been determined that a reasonable safety and security interest exists, including lighting required for the proper functioning of a security camera, at correctional facilities, school facilities, including at a State-related institution or other public college or university, and 20250HB0969PN1050 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospital facilities that cannot be addressed by another method without increasing the cost or reducing the effectiveness of the lighting.(4) The lighting units on active sports or show grounds may use lamps greater than 3,000K, but only for the duration of a specific practice, match or event. Lighting units shall be positioned, angled or shielded so as to prevent direct glare and light trespass onto neighboring property. The shielding must fully eliminate directly upward light emission.Section 5. Resources.The Department of General Services shall make available the following resources to encourage the utilization of responsible lighting principles, prepared in collaboration with the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources:(1) A model municipal ordinance or resolution for a political subdivision or other governmental unit.(2) A resource guide for the public encouraging the utilization of responsible lighting principles in homes and businesses.Section 6. Other laws.This act shall not supersede any other Federal or State law controlling lighting, outdoor lighting units or signage, outdoor advertising, displays or devices.Section 7. Applicability.The requirements of this act shall apply to the following:(1) Lighting on or in all newly constructed, renovated or retrofitted State property, whether that property is owned or leased by the Commonwealth, including rights-of-way, roadways and sidewalks, spaces, facilities, properties, 20250HB0969PN1050 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonhabitable structures, monuments and flagpoles.(2) A State agency.(3) A construction project undertaken by a State-related institution or State-aided entity, if the construction project is directly funded by the Commonwealth or a State agency.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0969PN1050 - 10 - 12345678